trunk/incubator/apertium-ga-gv.gv.dix
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZÇabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzç</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"      c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="np"     c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="adj"    c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="det"    c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="adv"    c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="pr"     c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="prn"    c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub" c="Sub-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"  c="Verb"/>

    <sdef n="ant"    c="Anthroponym"/>

    <sdef n="subj"   c="Subject"/>
    <sdef n="obj"    c="Object"/>

    <sdef n="comp"   c="Comparative"/>

    <sdef n="p1"     c="First person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"     c="Second person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"     c="Third person"/>

    <sdef n="mf"     c="Masculine + feminine"/>
    <sdef n="m"      c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="f"      c="Feminine"/>

    <sdef n="sg"     c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl"     c="Plural"/>

    <sdef n="ind"    c="Indefinite"/>
    <sdef n="pos"    c="Possessive"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <!-- Mutations -->

    <pardef n="initial-o">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>h-o</l>
          <r>o</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ho</l>
          <r>o</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>o</l>
          <r>o</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="initial-f">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>f</l>
          <r>f</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>v</l>
          <r>f</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>f</l>
          <r>f</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="initial-c">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>c</l>
          <r>c</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ch</l>
          <r>c</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>g</l>
          <r>c</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>c</l>
          <r>c</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="initial-th">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>th</l>
          <r>th</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>h</l>
          <r>th</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>dh</l>
          <r>th</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>th</l>
          <r>th</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  
     <pardef n="initial-u">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>u</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>hu</l>
          <r>u</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>u</l>
          <r>u</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  
    <pardef n="initial-s">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>h</l>
          <r>s</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>s</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>s</l>
          <r>s</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="initial-d">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>d</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>gh</l>
          <r>d</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>w</l>
          <r>d</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r>d</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>d</l>
          <r>d</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="initial-k">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>k</l>
          <r>k</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ch</l>
          <r>k</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>g</l>
          <r>k</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>k</l>
          <r>k</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="initial-g">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>g</l>
          <r>g</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>gh</l>
          <r>g</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ng</l>
          <r>g</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>g</l>
          <r>g</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
 
    <pardef n="initial-b">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>b</l>
          <r>b</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>v</l>
          <r>b</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>w</l>
          <r>b</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>m</l>
          <r>b</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>b</l>
          <r>b</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>




 
    <pardef n="initial-B">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>B</l>
          <r>B</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>V</l>
          <r>B</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>W</l>
          <r>B</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>M</l>
          <r>B</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>B</l>
          <r>B</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Pronouns -->

    <pardef n="prsubj__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mee</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oo</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eh</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ee</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>shin</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>shiu</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ad</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Proper nouns -->

    <pardef n="Breeshey__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Nouns -->

    <pardef n="/ben__n">
      <e>
        <par n="initial-b"/>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="initial-b"/>
        <p>
          <l>ranne</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ree__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aghyn</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="oie__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ghyn</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="personal"><i/><par n="prsubj__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ben"><i/><par n="/ben__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kayt"><par n="initial-k"/><i/><par n="k/ayt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="keyrrey"><par n="initial-k"/><i/><par n="k/eyrrey__n"/></e>
    <e lm="goayr"><par n="initial-g"/><i>oa</i><par n="goa/yr__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ushag"><par n="initial-u"/><i>shag</i><par n="ushag__n"/></e>
    <e lm="uinnag"><par n="initial-u"/><i>innag</i><par n="ushag__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fer"><par n="initial-f"/><i/><par n="f/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dooinney"><par n="initial-d"/><i/><par n="d/ooinney__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dorrys"><par n="initial-d"/><i>orry</i><par n="dorry/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cabbyl"><par n="initial-c"/><i>abb</i><par n="cabb/yl__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ushtey"><par n="initial-u"/><i>sht</i><par n="usht/ey__n"/></e>
    <e lm="slieau"><par n="initial-s"/><i>lie</i><par n="usht/ey__n"/></e>
    <e lm="baatey"><par n="initial-b"/><i>aat</i><par n="baat/ey__n"/></e>
    <e lm="oie"><par n="initial-o"/><i>ie</i><par n="oie__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ree"><i>ree</i><par n="ree__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spyrryd"><par n="initial-s"/><i>pyrryd</i><par n="spyrryd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ferrish"><par n="initial-f"/><i>errish</i><par n="spyrryd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="saggyrt"><par n="initial-s"/><i>aggyrt</i><par n="spyrryd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="thie"><par n="initial-th"/><i>ie</i><par n="spyrryd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="thie-ollee"><par n="initial-th"/><i>ie</i><par n="spyrryd__n"/><p><l>-ollee</l><r><g>-ollee</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="Breeshey"><par n="initial-B"/><i>reeshey</i><par n="Breeshey__np"/></e>
    <e lm="doo"><par n="initial-d"/><i>oo</i><par n="doo__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="deinagh"><par n="initial-d"/><i>einagh</i><par n="doo__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="skee"><par n="initial-s"/><i>kee</i><par n="doo__adj"/></e>
